port-foma/port.lexc
Multichar_Symbols 
 +Ger +Ind.Pr +Ind.Imp +Ind.Fut +Kond +Pret
 +1SG +2SG +3SG +1PL +3PL

LEXICON Root
 falar:fal ArVerb;
 comer:com ErVerb;
 partir:part IrVerb;

LEXICON ArVerb
+Ind.Pr: 1SG;
+Ind.Pr:a Person;
:a Common;
+Pret:e 1SGPret;
+Pret:a^ Pret;
+Ind.Imp:a^va AllPersons;

LEXICON ErVerb
+Ind.Pr: 1SG;
+Ind.Pr:e Person;
:e Common;
+Pret: 1SGPret;
+Pret:e Pret;
+Ind.Imp: IndImp;

LEXICON IrVerb
+Ind.Pr: 1SG;
+Ind.Pr:e Person;
:i Common;
+Pret: 1SGPret;
+Pret:i Pret;
+Ind.Imp: IndImp;

LEXICON Common
: Gerund;
:r Kond;
:r IndFut;
+Ind.Pr: 1PL;

LEXICON Gerund
+Ger:ndo #;

LEXICON Kond
+Kond: IndImp;

LEXICON IndFut
+Ind.Fut: PersonFut;

LEXICON IndImp
:i^a AllPersons;

LEXICON Pret
+2SG:ste #;
+3SG:u #;
+1PL:mos #;
+3PL:ram #;

LEXICON PersonFut
+1SG:ei #;
+2SG:ás #;
+3SG:á #;
+1PL:emos #;
+3PL:ão #;

LEXICON Person
 2SG;
 3SG;
 3PL;

LEXICON AllPersons
 Person;
+1SG: #;
 1PL;

LEXICON 1SG
+1SG:o #;

LEXICON 2SG
+2SG:s #;

LEXICON 3SG
+3SG: #;

LEXICON 1PL
+1PL:mos #;

LEXICON 3PL
+3PL:m #;

LEXICON 1SGPret
+1SG:i #;
